District of Columbia statutes.
31-1203

Assessments.

(a)

The Mayor shall assess annually each insurer and health maintenance organization doing business in the District an amount based on a percentage of its direct gross receipts for the preceding year, provided that each insurer and health maintenance organization shall be subject to a minimum annual assessment of no less than $1000. The Mayor shall establish in each assessable year the assessment rate, not to exceed 3/10 of 1% of the direct gross receipts. In no event shall the amount assessed exceed the amount budgeted by the Council.

(b)

The Mayor shall compute the assessment for each insurer and health maintenance organization and send the insurer and health maintenance organization this information in a “Notice of Assessment”. Each insurer and health maintenance organization shall pay to the Mayor the amount stated in the Notice of Assessment within 30 days of the mailing date of the Notice of Assessment. The assessment shall be a tax and licensing and regulatory fee for purposes of 45 CFR §§ 158.221(c) and 158.161(b).

(c)

The annual billing cycle for the assessment established by this section shall be the fiscal year of the District of Columbia.

History

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-40, § 4, 40 DCR 6009
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 24(e), 44 DCR 818
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5082(a), 61 DCR 9990

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-1202 and § 31-1204.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-2703.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added the last sentence in (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5082(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5082(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5082(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).